New York, session 2025-2026, S551.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 424-c to read as follows: 3 § 424-c. Information regarding parent or caretaker's rights. A parent 4 or caretaker has the right to receive certain information regarding 5 their rights at the initial point of contact during a child protective 6 services investigation. 7 1. Upon receiving a report of alleged maltreatment or abuse of a child 8 pursuant to section four hundred fifteen of this title child protective 9 services shall, at the initial point of contact with a parent or care- 10 taker, orally and in writing disseminate, in plain language of the 11 parent or caretaker's preferred language, information regarding the 12 parent or caretaker's rights during such investigation and shall docu- 13 ment in the case record that such information has been provided to the 14 parent or caretaker. Such information shall include, but need not be 15 limited to, the following information: 16 (a) The parent or caretaker is not required to permit the child 17 protective services representative to enter the residence of the parent 18 or caretaker; 19 (b) The parent or caretaker who is the subject of the investigation is 20 entitled to be informed of the allegations being investigated; 21 (c) The parent or caretaker is not required to speak with the child 22 protective services representative, and any statement made by the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00066-01-5 S. 551 2 1 parent, caretaker or other family member may be used against the parent 2 or caretaker in an administrative or court proceeding; 3 (d) The parent or caretaker is entitled to seek the advice of an 4 attorney and to have an attorney present when the parent or caretaker is 5 questioned by a child protective services representative, including at 6 any meeting conducted with the parent or caretaker to determine whether 7 the parent or caretaker's child should be removed from the home; 8 (e) The child protective services representative is not an attorney 9 and cannot provide legal advice to the parent or caretaker; 10 (f) The parent or caretaker is not required to allow a child protec- 11 tive services representative to interview or examine a child; 12 (g) The parent or caretaker is not required to sign any document or 13 accept any services presented by a child protective services represen- 14 tative, and is entitled to have an attorney review any such document 15 before agreeing to sign it; 16 (h) Contact information for resources which may be available to 17 parents and caretakers during a child protective services investigation, 18 including legal services from a designated organization; and 19 (i) The parent or caretaker is entitled to exercise any and all 20 rights. Regardless of whether the parent or caretaker exercises their 21 rights, child protective services is required to determine how best to 22 assess the safety of the child or children. The parent or caretaker may 23 wish to speak with an attorney or advocate before they determine how to 24 proceed. 25 2. The child protective services representative shall make reasonable 26 efforts to ensure that the notice and all information required to be 27 provided to a parent or caretaker pursuant to subdivision one of this 28 section is written in a manner which will be understood by the parent or 29 guardian, including, but not limited to, ensuring that the notice and 30 information is written in the preferred language of the parent or care- 31 taker. In the event the preferred language of the parent or caretaker is 32 unknown prior to the initial contact, a child preventive services repre- 33 sentative may provide the information orally utilizing a translation 34 service. 35 3. The child protective services representative shall sign and date 36 the notice described in subdivision one of this section as evidence of 37 having provided the notice at the first point of contact. The child 38 protective services representative shall provide the parent or caretaker 39 with a copy of the signed notice at the time. 40 4. If at the initial point of contact with the parent or caretaker the 41 child protective services representative has reasonable cause to believe 42 that exigent circumstances exist that present an imminent danger to the 43 child's life or health and there is no time to seek a court order under 44 section one thousand twenty-four of the family court act, the child 45 protective services representative shall take all lawful measures neces- 46 sary to protect the child's life or health prior to disseminating infor- 47 mation regarding the parent or caretaker's rights during the investi- 48 gation pursuant to subdivision one of this section. 49 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 50 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 51 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 52 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 53 on or before such effective date.